Utah statutes.
4-18-6.5.   Grants to improve manure management or control runoff at animal
feeding operations.
(1) (a)  The commission may make grants to owners or operators of animal
feeding operations to pay for costs of plans or projects to improve manure
management or control surface water runoff, including costs of preparing or
implementing comprehensive nutrient management plans.
(b)  The commission shall make the grants described in Subsection (1)(a) from
funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose.
(2) (a)  In awarding grants, the commission shall consider the following
criteria:
(i)  the ability of the grantee to pay for costs of plans or projects to
improve manure management or control surface water runoff;
(ii)  the availability of:
(A)  matching funds provided by the grantee or another source; or
(B)  material, labor, or other items of value provided in lieu of money by the
grantee or another source; and
(iii)  the benefits that accrue to the general public by the awarding of a
grant.
(b)  The commission may establish by rule additional criteria for the awarding
of grants.
(3)  The commission shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to implement this section.
